Nebraska, session 109, LB947.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB947 LB947
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 2-958, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
2-958 (1) A noxious weed control fund may be established for each
control authority, which fund shall be available for expenses authorized
to be paid from such fund, including necessary expenses of the control
authority in carrying out its duties and responsibilities under the
Noxious Weed Control Act. The weed control superintendent within the
county shall (a) ascertain and tabulate each year the approximate amount
of land infested with noxious weeds and its location in the county, (b)
ascertain and prepare all information required by the county board in the
preparation of the county budget, including actual and expected revenue
from all sources, cash balances, expenditures, amounts proposed to be
expended during the year, and working capital, and (c) transmit such
information tabulated by the control authority to the county board not
later than June 1 of each year.
(2) The Noxious Weed Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of
proceeds raised from fees imposed for the registration of pesticides and
earmarked for the fund pursuant to section 2-2634, funds credited or
transferred pursuant to sections 2-509, 2-518, and 81-201, and 81-201.05,
any gifts, grants, or donations from any source, and any reimbursement
funds for control work done pursuant to subdivision (1)(b)(vi) of section
2-954. An amount from the General Fund may be appropriated annually for
the Noxious Weed Control Act. The fund shall be administered and used by
the director to maintain the noxious weed control program and for
expenses directly related to the program. Until January 1, 2025, the fund
may also be used to defray all reasonable and necessary costs related to
the administration of the Nebraska Hemp Farming Act.
(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 2. Section 2-1091, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-2-

LB947 LB947
2026 2026
amended to read:
2-1091 For the purpose of implementation or enforcement of the Plant
Protection and Plant Pest Act or any rule or regulation, the department
may:
(1) Enter at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner without
being subject to any action for trespass or damages, if reasonable care
is exercised, all property where plants are grown, packed, held prior to
distribution, or distributed for the purpose of inspecting all plants,
structures, vehicles, equipment, packing materials, containers, records,
and labels on such property or otherwise implementing or enforcing the
act. The department may inspect and examine all records and property
relating to compliance with the act. Such records and property shall be
made available to the department for review at all reasonable times;
(2) In a reasonable manner, hold for inspection and take samples of
any plants and associated materials which may not be in compliance with
the act;
(3) Inspect or reinspect at any time or place any plants that are in
the state or being shipped into or through the state and treat, seize,
destroy, require treatment or destruction of, or return to the state of
origin any plants in order to inhibit or prevent the movement of plant
pests throughout the state;
(4) Obtain an inspection warrant in the manner prescribed in
sections 29-830 to 29-835 from a court of record if any person refuses to
allow the department to inspect pursuant to this section;
(5) Issue a written or printed withdrawal-from-distribution order
and post signs to delineate sections not marked pursuant to subsection
(3) of section 2-1095 or sections of distribution locations and to notify
persons of any withdrawal-from-distribution order when the department has
reasonable cause to believe any lot of nursery stock is being distributed
in violation of the act or any rule or regulation;
(6) Apply for a restraining order, a temporary or permanent
-3-

LB947 LB947
2026 2026
injunction, or a mandatory injunction against any person violating or
threatening to violate the act or the rules and regulations. The district
court of the county where the violation is occurring or is about to occur
shall have jurisdiction to grant such relief upon good cause shown.
Relief may be granted notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy
at law and shall be granted without bond;
(7) Issue a quarantine or establish a quarantine area;
(8) Cooperate and enter into agreements, including harmonization
plans, with any person in order to carry out the purpose of the act;
(9) Establish a restricted plant pest list to prohibit the movement
into the state of plant pests not known to occur in Nebraska and to
prohibit the movement of those plant pests present in the state but known
to be destructive to the plant industry;
(10) Issue European corn borer quarantine certificates,
phytosanitary certificates, and export certificates on plants for
individual shipment to other states or foreign countries if those plants
comply with the requirements or regulations of such state or foreign
country or issue quarantine compliance agreements or European corn borer
quarantine certification licenses;
(11) Inspect plants that any person desires to ship into another
state or country when such person has made an application to the
department for such inspection. The inspection shall determine the
presence of plant pests to determine the acceptance of the plants into
other states or countries. The department may accept the inspections of
laboratories authorized by the department or field inspectors of the
department;
(12) Certify plants or property to meet the requirements of specific
quarantines imposed on Nebraska or Nebraska plants. The quarantine
certification requirements shall be set forth in the rules and
regulations;
(13) Assess Until increased or decreased by rules or regulations,
-4-

LB947 LB947
2026 2026
assess and collect fees set forth in section 2-1091.02 for inspections,
services, or work performed in carrying out subdivisions (8) and (10)
through (12) of this section. Inspection time shall be determined based
on any portion of a whole hour and shall include the driving to and from
the location of the inspection in addition to the time spent conducting
the inspection, and the mileage charge shall be for the purpose of
inspection. Any fee charged to the department relating to such
subdivisions shall be paid by the person requesting the inspection,
services, or work. The department may, for purposes of administering such
subdivisions, establish in rules and regulations inspection requirements,
standards, and issuance, renewal, or revocation of licenses,
certificates, or agreements necessitated by such subdivisions;
(14) Conduct continuing survey and detection programs on plant pests
to monitor the population or spread of plant pests;
(15) Implement programs or plans to eradicate, manage, treat, or
control plant pests;
(16) Issue, place on probation, suspend, or revoke licenses issued
or agreements entered into pursuant to the act or deny applications for
such licenses or agreements pursuant to the act; and
(17) Issue orders imposing administrative fines or cease and desist
orders pursuant to the act.
Sec. 3. Section 2-1091.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-1091.02 (1) Fees under License fees for the Plant Protection and
Plant Pest Act that are due on January 1, 2027 2014, shall be the amount
in column A of subsection (3) of this section.
(2) The license fees due January 1, 2028 2015, and each January 1
thereafter shall be set by the director on or before July 1 of each year.
The director may raise or lower such fees each year to meet the criteria
in this subsection, but the fee shall not be greater than the amount in
column B of subsection (3) of this section. The same percentage shall be
-5-

LB947 LB947
2026 2026
applied to each category for all fee increases or decreases. The director
shall use the fees in column A of subsection (3) of this section as a
base for future fee increases or decreases. The director shall determine
the fees based on estimated annual revenue and fiscal year-end cash fund
balances as follows:
(a) The estimated annual revenue shall not be greater than one
hundred seven percent of program cash fund appropriations allocated for
the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Act; and
(b) The estimated fiscal year-end cash fund balance shall not be
greater than seventeen percent of program cash fund appropriations
allocated for the act.
(3) License Fees.
Fees A B
License Fees A B
Nursery stock
distributor license
as set forth in
section 2-1091.01
for the first acre $140 $180
for the first acre $115 $140
Fee for additional acres $39 per acre $50 per acre
Fee for additional acres $5.00 per acre $6.00 per acre
Distributing without 25% of the fee
obtaining a nursery per month up to
stock distributor 100% of the
license fee license fee
(4) Other fees for the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Act under
subsection (5) of this section in effect on January 1, 2014, shall be the
amount in column A of such subsection. The department may increase or
decrease such fees by rules or regulations adopted and promulgated by the
-6-

LB947 LB947
2026 2026
department. Such increases shall not result in fees greater than the
amount in column B of subsection (5) of this section.
(5) Other Fees.
Other Fees A B
Certification fee for
nursery stock growing
acres as set forth in Included in
section 2-1095 license fee
Inspection fees due
under section $39 per hour $50 per hour
2-1091 or 2-1095 $0.70 per mile $1.00 per mile
Late applications for
certification of nursery $24 per hour $27 per hour
stock growing acres $0.42 per mile $0.50 per mile
Reinspections or
requested inspections $24 per hour $27 per hour
for nursery stock $0.42 per mile $0.50 per mile
Phytosanitary or $60 per certificate $106 per certificate
export certificates
set forth in section 2-1091
Phytosanitary or $30 per certificate $40 per
export certificates and $7 for taking certificate and
set forth in an application $10 for taking
section 2-1091 by telephone an application
by telephone
Phytosanitary or
export certificate
inspections and $24 per hour $27 per hour
reinspections $0.42 per mile $0.50 per mile
European corn borer
-7-

LB947 LB947
2026 2026
quarantine certification
license set forth in $65 per license, $80 per license,
license set forth in $50 per license, $65 per license,
section 2-1091 annually annually
European corn borer $25 for $35 for
European corn borer $6.25 for $10.00 for
certificate packet of 25 packet of 25
Quarantine compliance
agreements as set $65 per agreement, $80 per agreement,
agreements as set $50 per agreement $65 per agreement
forth in section 2-1091 annually annually
Quarantine compliance
agreement inspections $24 per hour $27 per hour
and reinspections $0.42 per mile $0.50 per mile
(4) A person that is distributing without first obtaining a nursery
stock distributor license shall pay an additional fee of twenty-five
percent of the license fee that is due for each month that such person
failed to obtain such license.
(5) (6) Any fee remaining unpaid for more than one month shall be
considered delinquent and the person owing the fee shall pay an
additional administrative fee of twenty-five percent of the delinquent
amount for each month it remains unpaid, not to exceed one hundred
percent of the original amount due. The department may waive the
additional administrative fee based upon the existence and extent of any
mitigating circumstances that have resulted in the late payment of such
fee. The purpose of the additional administrative fee is to cover the
administrative costs associated with collecting fees, and all money
collected as an additional administrative fee shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Cash
Fund.
-8-

LB947 LB947
2026 2026
Sec. 4. Section 2-1095, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-1095 (1) All nursery stock distributors that distribute any
nursery stock that they grow shall apply for a certification an
additional inspection for the certification of the Nebraska-grown nursery
stock as provided in this section. The nursery stock distributor shall
receive apply for such certification inspection of the Nebraska-grown
nursery stock as part of the application for the nursery stock
distributor license described in section 2-1091.01.
(2)(a) Applications for certification inspection of Nebraska-grown
nursery stock that are due on January 1 pursuant to section 2-1091.01 and
are not received prior to February 1 and initial applications not
received prior to beginning of distribution shall be considered
delinquent. Such applications shall be accompanied with the have an
inspection fee that is as set forth in section 2-1091.02.
(b) Inspection time shall be determined based on any portion of a
whole hour and shall include the driving time to and from the location of
the inspection in addition to the time spent conducting the inspection,
and the mileage charge shall be for the purpose of inspection.
(3) Each nursery stock distributor shall post signs delineating
sections of all growing areas. A section shall be not larger than five
acres.
(4) All growing areas within the state shall be inspected by the
department at least once per year for certification and compliance with
the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Act.
(5) Following the certification inspection of Nebraska-grown nursery
stock, the department shall provide a copy of the plant inspection report
to the nursery stock distributor specifying any area of the nursery from
which nursery stock cannot be distributed or any plants which may not be
distributed as nursery stock. When deemed necessary to maintain
compliance with the purposes of the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Act,
-9-

LB947 LB947
2026 2026
the department shall require the nursery stock distributor to withdraw
from distribution any variety or amount of nursery stock. A reinspection
may be conducted by the department at the nursery stock distributor's
request and cost. The department may also reinspect to determine
compliance with the act. To determine the cost of any reinspection, the
department shall use fees as outlined in subsection (2) of this section.
The nursery stock distributor shall comply with the recommendations of
the department as to the treatment or destruction of nursery stock.
(6) The department may require the treatment or destruction of any
nursery stock that is infested or infected with plant pests, nonviable,
damaged, or desiccated to the point of not being reasonably capable of
growth.
(7) Any nursery stock on which a withdrawal-from-distribution order
has been issued shall be released for distribution only by authorized
department employees or after written permission has been obtained from
the department. Each nursery stock distributor shall promptly report to
the department, in writing, the amount and type of plants treated or
destroyed under requirements on withdrawal-from-distribution orders. The
department may withhold a license or certification of Nebraska-grown
nursery stock until conditions have been met by the nursery stock
distributor as specified in the plant inspection report or any other
order issued by the department. A certification of Nebraska-grown stock
may be issued covering portions of the nursery which are not infested or
infected if the nursery stock distributor agrees to treat, destroy, or
remove as specified by the department those plants found to be infested
or infected.
Sec. 5. Section 2-10,117, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-10,117 All money received from any source pursuant to the Plant
Protection and Plant Pest Act and section 81-2,162.23 shall be remitted
by the department to the State Treasurer and by the State Treasurer
-10-

LB947 LB947
2026 2026
credited to the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Cash Fund which is hereby
created. The fund also shall include funds transferred pursuant to
section 81-201.05. The fund shall be used by the department to aid in
defraying the expenses of administering the act. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 6. Section 2-1808, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-1808 The State Treasurer is hereby directed to establish and set
up in the treasury of the State of Nebraska a fund to be known as the
Nebraska Potato Development Fund, to which fund shall be credited, for
the uses and purposes of the Nebraska Potato Development Act and its
enforcement, all taxes and fees collected by the Department of
Agriculture. After appropriation, the Director of Administrative
Services, upon receipt of proper vouchers approved by the director of the
department, shall issue his or her warrants on such funds and the State
Treasurer shall pay the same out of the money credited to the fund. Any
money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. The fund terminates on July 1, 2026,
and the State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the fund to the Plant
Protection and Plant Pest Cash Fund as soon as administratively
practicable.
Sec. 7. Section 2-2634, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-2634 (1) As a condition to registration or renewal of registration
as required by sections 2-2628 to 2-2633, an applicant shall pay to the
department a fee of two hundred one hundred sixty dollars for each
pesticide to be registered, except that the fee may be increased or
decreased by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to
-11-

LB947 LB947
2026 2026
the Pesticide Act. In no event shall such fee exceed two hundred fifty
two hundred ten dollars for each pesticide to be registered.
(2) All fees collected under subsection (1) of this section shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit as follows:
(a) Fifty Thirty dollars of such fee to the Noxious Weed Cash Fund
as provided in section 2-958;
(b) Fifty dollars of such fee to the Buffer Strip Incentive Fund as
provided in section 2-5106;
(c) Fifty-five dollars of such fee to the Natural Resources Water
Quality Fund; and
(d) The remainder of such fee to the Pesticide Administrative Cash
Fund.
(3) If a person fails to apply for renewal of registration before
January 1 of any year, such person, as a condition to renewal, shall pay
a late registration fee equal to twenty-five percent of the fee due and
owing per month, not to exceed one hundred percent, for each product to
be renewed in addition to the renewal fee. The purpose of the late
registration fee is to cover the administrative costs associated with
collecting fees, and all money collected as a late registration fee shall
be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Pesticide
Administrative Cash Fund.
Sec. 8. Section 81-201, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-201 The Department of Agriculture may: shall have power
(1) Encourage to encourage and promote, in every practicable manner,
the interest of agriculture;
(2) Promote to promote methods of conducting the industry of
agriculture with a view to increasing the production and facilitating the
distribution thereof at the least cost;
(3) Collect to collect and publish statistics relating to the
production and marketing of agricultural products, so far as such
-12-

LB947 LB947
2026 2026
statistical information may be of value to the agricultural and allied
interests of the state, and to cooperate with the federal government in
the matter of collecting and publishing such statistical information;
(4) Distribute or dispose of any remaining to publish and distribute
the Weeds of the Great Plains books book and supplemental inserts thereto
that are in the possession of the department. By January 1, 2027, the
State Treasurer shall transfer all money in the Weed Book Cash Fund to
the Noxious Weed Cash Fund. , for sale and distribution to the public.
All money collected from the sale of the publications shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer and credited to the Noxious Weed Cash Fund as
provided in section 81-201.05;
(5) Inquire to inquire into the causes of contagious, infectious,
and communicable diseases among domestic animals and the means for the
prevention and cure of the same;
(6) Execute to execute and enforce all laws relating to matters
within its jurisdiction and to adopt necessary rules and regulations for
the administration and enforcement of such laws;
(7) Employ to employ special investigators who shall be appointed
deputy state sheriffs by the Governor and who shall, upon qualifying for
such office, possess all the powers which attach to such office, except
that their powers and duties shall be restricted to the enforcement of
the laws of the State of Nebraska within the jurisdiction of the
Department of Agriculture;
(8) Perform to perform laboratory testing services as provided in
section 81-2,293; and
(9) Enforce to enforce the Foreign-owned Real Estate National
Security Act.
Sec. 9. Original sections 2-1091, 2-1091.02, 2-1095, 2-10,117,
2-1808, 2-2634, and 81-201, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and
section 2-958, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-13-

LB947 LB947
2026 2026
Sec. 10. The following section is outright repealed: Section
81-201.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
Sec. 11. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-14-